Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20158-153
Checks; preprinted information; cleared at par; exception.

All checks, unless sent to banks as special collection items, shall have preprinted the magnetically encoded routing and transit symbol of the bank and either the name of the maker or the magnetically encoded account number of the maker. Except for checks sent to banks as special collection items or checks presented for payment by the payee in person, all checks drawn on any bank organized under the laws of this state shall be cleared at par by the bank on which they are drawn. The term at par applies only to the settlement of checks between collecting and paying or remitting banks and does not apply to or prohibit a bank from deducting a fee from the face amount of the check for paying the check if the check is presented to the bank by the payee in person.

Laws 1945, c. 11, § 1, p. 110;

R.R.S.1943, § 8-163.01;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 53, p. 157;

Laws 1979, LB 269, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB155, § 3.

Special collection items are those which in fact actually require the employment of unusual and individual treatment. Placek v. Edstrom, 151 Neb. 225, 37 N.W.2d 203 (1949).

Act sustained as constitutional. Placek v. Edstrom, 148 Neb. 79, 26 N.W.2d 489 (1947).